Hawaii statutes.
§329-36 Records of registrants.
Persons registered to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, dispense, or conduct
reverse distribution with controlled substances under this chapter shall keep
records and maintain inventories in conformance with the recordkeeping and
inventory requirements of federal law and with any additional rules the
department of public safety issues. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 281,
§10; am L 2016, c 218, §10]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next